Nebraska, session 109, LB288A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $97,030 from the Middle Income
Workforce Housing Investment Fund and $103,200 from the Affordable Housing
Trust Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $118,110 from the Middle Income Workforce
Housing Investment Fund and $126,410 from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund for
FY2026-27 to the Department of Economic Development, for Program 601, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 288, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $103,520 for FY2025-26 or
$138,030 for FY2026-27.
-1-